Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 29. Renewable Energy Co-Location of Distribution Facilities.

§ 56-614.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Distribution facilities” includes poles and wires, or cables, or pipelines or other underground conduits by which a renewable generator is able to (i) supply electricity generated at its renewable energy facility to the electric distribution grid, (ii)
distribute steam generated at its renewable energy facility to customers, or (iii) supply landfill gas it collects to customers or a natural gas distribution or transmission pipeline.

“Locality” means the same as that term is defined in §

15.2-102

.

“Public highway” means, for purposes of computing the public rights-of-way use fee, the centerline mileage of highways and streets that are part of the primary state highway system as defined in §

33.2-100

, the secondary state highway system as defined in §§

33.2-100

and

33.2-324

, the highways of those cities and certain towns defined in §

33.2-319

, and the highways and streets maintained and operated by counties that have withdrawn or elect to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly
of 1932 and that have not elected to return.

“Public rights-of-way use fee” means the fee chargeable to a renewable generator for the occupation and use of public streets, roads, highways, works, turnpikes, streets, avenues, and alleys in the Commonwealth by a locality or the Commonwealth Transportation
Board for a renewable generator for its distribution facilities.

“Renewable energy facility” means (i) an electrical generation facility that produces not more than 2 megawatts peak net power output to the distribution grid, which electricity is generated only from a renewable energy source; (ii) a steam reduction
facility with a rated capacity of not more than 5,000 mmBtus per hour that produces steam only from a renewable energy source; or (iii) a solid waste management facility permitted by the Department of Environmental Quality from which
landfill gas is transmitted or distributed off premises.

“Renewable energy source” means energy derived from any source specified in the definition of renewable energy in § 56-576.

“Renewable generator” means a person that (i) does not have the power of a public service corporation to acquire rights-of-way, easements, or other interests in lands as provided in § 56-49 and (ii) operates a renewable energy facility.

“Restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way” includes permitting processes; requirements regarding notice, time, and location of excavations and repair work; enforcement of the statewide building code; and inspections
but does not include any existing franchise fee or public rights-of-way use fee.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1100; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 2 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of Title 45.1, Title 67, or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such title existed prior to October
1, 2021, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 45.2 or any other title of the Code of Virginia and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 45.2 or any other
title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 45.1, Title 67, or any other title appearing in the Code of Virginia shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions,
requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 45.1 or such other titles of the Code of Virginia as are in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in
effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 45.1 and repeal of Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2021 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 5 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective October 1, 2021, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date,
or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that date. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, nor the enactment of Title 45.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2021, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued
in effect for that purpose. For the purposes of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2021, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 6 provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2021, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title
45.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 7 provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of Title 45.2 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate
the remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the
provisions of Title 45.2 are declared severable.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 8 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under
such loan agreement or other contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 9 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any properly recorded deed that was recorded prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 10 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any bond or other debt obligation authorized, issued, or outstanding prior to such
repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 12 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the existing terms of persons currently serving as members of any agency, board, authority, commission, or other entity and that appointees currently holding
positions shall maintain their terms of appointment and continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made on or after October 1, 2021, shall be made in accordance
with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-615.
Right to occupy rights-of-way; location of rights-of-way.

Every renewable generator shall have authority to occupy and use the public roads, works, turnpikes, streets, avenues, and alleys in any county, with the consent of the board of supervisors or other governing authority thereof, or in any incorporated
city or town, with the consent of the council thereof, and the waterways within the Commonwealth, with the consent of the Marine Resources Commission, for the erection of distribution facilities. However, if the road or street
is in the primary state highway system or the secondary state highway system, the consent of the board of supervisors or other governing authority of any county shall not be necessary, provided that a permit for such occupation
and use is first obtained from the Department of Transportation. The use of any road or street in the primary state highway system or secondary state highway system that has been designated a limited access highway in accordance
with §

33.2-401

shall not be permitted, unless the Department of Transportation approves an exception in accordance with the then-current policy.

Neither a locality nor the Department of Transportation shall impose any fees on a renewable generator for the use of public rights-of-way except in the manner prescribed in § 56-617.

Neither a locality nor the Department of Transportation shall impose on renewable generators, whether by franchise, ordinance, or other means, any restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way that are (i) unfair or unreasonable
or (ii) any greater than those imposed on providers of electric or natural gas utility service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any permit or other permission required by a locality pursuant to a franchise, ordinance, or other permission to use the public rights-of-way or by the Department of Transportation of a renewable generator to
use the public rights-of-way shall be granted or denied within 45 days from submission and, if denied, accompanied by a written explanation of the reasons the permit was denied and the actions required to cure the denial.

Neither a locality receiving directly or indirectly a public rights-of-way use fee nor the Department of Transportation shall require a renewable generator to provide in-kind services or physical assets as a condition of consent to use public rights-of-way
or easements, or in lieu of the public rights-of-way use fee.

This chapter shall not affect the obligation of the Department of Transportation to give notice, pursuant to §

33.2-272

, to localities when it grants its permission for the construction, installation, location, or placement of a landfill gas pipeline within any highway right-of-way.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1101; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-616.
Occupation of property of certain localities; imposition of terms and conditions as to use of property.

Any incorporated city or town may impose upon a renewable generator any terms and conditions consistent herewith and supplemental hereto, as to the occupation and use of its streets, avenues, and alleys, and as to the construction and maintenance of the
distribution facilities of the renewable generator along, over, or under the same, that the city or town may deem expedient and proper.

No locality shall impose any fees on a renewable generator for the use of public rights-of-way except in the manner prescribed in § 56-617.

No locality shall impose on a renewable generator, whether by franchise, ordinance, or other means, any restrictions or requirements concerning the use of the public rights-of-way that are (i) unfair or unreasonable or (ii) any greater than those imposed
on providers of electric or natural gas utility service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any permit or other permission required by a locality pursuant to a franchise, ordinance, or other permission to use the public rights-of-way of a renewable generator to use the public rights-of-way shall be
granted or denied within 45 days from submission and, if denied, accompanied by a written explanation of the reasons the permit was denied and the actions required to cure the denial.

No locality receiving directly or indirectly a public rights-of-way use fee shall require a renewable generator to provide in-kind services or physical assets as a condition of consent to use public rights-of-way or easements, or in lieu of the public
rights-of-way use fee.

A renewable generator shall have the same rights, duties, and responsibilities related to the crossing of a railroad as afforded other public service corporations in §§ 56-12, 56-17 through 56-22, 56-25, 56-26, and 56-27. Nothing in this chapter shall
expand the rights of renewable generators to either cross or otherwise have access to railroad property to an extent greater than that afforded other public service corporations in this title.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1102; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-617.
Public rights-of-way use fee.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, there is hereby established a public rights-of-way use fee to be charged in lieu of any and all fees of general application, except for zoning, subdivision, site plan, and comprehensive plan fees of general
application, otherwise chargeable to a renewable generator by the Department of Transportation or a locality in connection with a permit for such occupation and use granted in accordance with § 56-615 or 56-616. The public rights-of-way
use fee established by this section is imposed on all renewable generators that occupy and use public rights-of-way in order to (i) supply electricity generated at its renewable energy facility to the electric distribution grid,
(ii) distribute steam generated at its renewable energy facility to customers, or (iii) supply landfill gas to customers or to a natural gas distribution or transmission pipeline.

The amount of the public rights-of-way use fee for a renewable generator shall be $1,500 per mile or any portion thereof over which the renewable generator has installed distribution facilities.

A renewable generator shall remit its required public rights-of-way use fee to the locality or the Department of Transportation, as applicable, prior to initiation of construction, as follows:

The renewable generator shall remit directly to the applicable locality all public rights-of-way use fees billed in (i) cities, (ii) towns whose public streets and roads are not maintained by the Department of Transportation, and (iii) any county that
has withdrawn or elects to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and that has elected not to return.

The public rights-of-way use fees in all other counties shall be remitted by each renewable generator to the Department of Transportation, and shall first be used to offset the administrative costs of processing the permit with the remaining fee being
added to the secondary system construction improvement program funds of the counties where the facilities are located.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1103; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-618.
Reimbursement for relocation costs.

Renewable generators shall be reimbursed 100 percent of the eligible cost of relocating distribution facilities installed in the public rights-of-way, for the first three years after the completion of the installation, that are incurred at the direction
of a locality that imposes by ordinance the public rights-of-way use fee or the Department of Transportation in any public rights-of-way in accordance with §§ 56-458 and 56-462. For the fourth through sixth year after the completion
of the installation, the renewable generator shall be reimbursed 50 percent of the eligible cost for the relocation of facilities installed in the public rights-of-way. Beginning in the seventh year, the renewable generators shall
be responsible for the cost of relocating facilities installed in the public rights-of-way. Such reimbursement shall be received from either (i) the locality that granted the permit or franchise to use such right-of-way or (ii)
the Commonwealth Transportation Board if the road or street is in the primary state highway system or the secondary state highway system.

The amount of relocation reimbursement in any fiscal year to be reimbursed under this section shall not exceed the amount of public rights-of-way use fees received by that locality or the Department of Transportation from the renewable generator required
to relocate its distribution facilities.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1104; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-619.
Relocation of lines or works of renewable generator acquired by Commonwealth Transportation Board.

Whenever a renewable generator is required by the Commonwealth Transportation Board or the Commissioner of Highways to remove any part of its distribution facilities off of the right-of-way of a road now or hereafter included in the primary or secondary
state highway system, or if any right-of-way, property, or interest therein used and occupied by the renewable generator with its lines or works, or part thereof, is acquired by the Commonwealth Transportation Board or the Commissioner
of Highways for the uses of the primary or secondary state highway system, or if the renewable generator is notified by such Board or Commissioner of the desire of such Board or Commissioner to acquire such right-of-way, property,
or interest therein, used and occupied by such company with its lines or works, or part thereof, for the uses of the primary or secondary state highway system, the renewable generator shall relocate its lines or works, or the part
or parts thereof affected.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1105; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-620.
How consent of appropriate authorities obtained; terms of use.

The consent required under § 56-615, when given, shall be by ordinance regularly adopted by the council or other governing body of the city or town or by resolution regularly adopted and spread upon the minutes by the board of supervisors or other governing
authority of the county in which such line is to be located, or, if such permission is to be given by the Commissioner of Highways or his designee, through the issuance of a land use permit. Such use of the public roads, turnpikes,
streets, avenues, and alleys in any of the cities or towns or counties of the Commonwealth shall be subject to such terms, regulations, and restrictions as may be imposed by the corporate authorities of any such city or town, or the
board of supervisors or other governing authority of any such county, except that if the road or street is in the primary or secondary state highway system, as now or hereafter established, any occupation and use thereof under the
provisions of this chapter, whether by consent heretofore or hereafter obtained, shall be subject to such terms, regulations, and restrictions as may be imposed by the Commonwealth Transportation Board not in conflict in incorporated
cities and towns with any vested contractual rights of such company with such city or town.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1106; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-621.
Cost to Commonwealth in connection with inspection and coordination of construction of line to be paid by renewable generator.

The actual costs and expenses of the Commonwealth for the inspection or coordination of the construction or installation of any of the distribution facilities of the renewable generator, under the provisions of this chapter, under any permit of the Commonwealth
Transportation Board shall be borne by the renewable generator. The sum of the payment required by this section shall be paid to the Department of Transportation within 30 days from the receipt of a progress or final bill from the
Department of Transportation.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1107; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-622.
Renewable generator may contract for right-of-way.

A renewable generator may contract with any person that owns lands, or any interest, franchise, privilege, or easement therein or in respect thereto, over which distribution facilities are proposed to be constructed, for the right-of-way for erecting,
repairing, and preserving its poles and other structures necessary for operating its facilities, and for sufficient land for the erection and occupation of offices at suitable distances along its distribution facilities.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1108; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-623.
Construction of transmission facilities.

All posts, poles, wires, cables, lines, pipelines, conduits, and other distribution facilities erected under any authority conferred by this chapter shall be so located as in no way to obstruct or interfere with public travel or the ordinary use of, or
the safety and convenience of persons traveling through, on, or over, the public roads, turnpikes, streets, avenues, alleys, railroads, or waters in or upon which the same may be erected. All distribution facilities erected as aforesaid
shall be placed at such height as provided by regulations of the Commission or the Commonwealth Transportation Board. Buried distribution facilities shall be laid at such distance below the surface of any public road, turnpike, street,
avenue, or alley, and at such distance from the outside of any gas or water main or other conduit already laid under such public road, turnpike, street, avenue, or alley, as prescribed by regulations of the Commission or by the Commonwealth
Transportation Board. No distribution facilities shall be strung across or laid, nor posts or poles erected, upon the property of any person without first obtaining the consent of the owner thereof. Such distribution facilities shall
not damage private property without compensation therefor, nor in any way obstruct the navigation of any stream, or impair or endanger the use thereof by the public or any other person entitled to the use of the same. In consideration
of co-locating on existing rights of way, the renewable generator shall meet the respective safety and clearance standards of the public service corporation including the National Electrical Safety Code, the Underground Utility Damage
Prevention Act (§ 56-265.14 et seq.), gas pipeline safety standards pursuant to § 56-257.2, and the public service corporation’s own safety and clearance standards as the same are communicated to the renewable generator in writing,
and any applicable federal laws and regulations.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1109; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 56-624.
Restoring condition of ground.

The portions of the surface of the roads, turnpikes, streets, avenues, or alleys, or of any pavements opened up or disturbed in erecting, repairing, laying, or replacing distribution facilities under the provisions of this chapter shall be immediately
restored to and maintained in good condition by the renewable generator doing such work. In case of the failure of the renewable generator to restore and maintain the same, the corporate authorities of the city or town, or the board
of supervisors or other governing authority of the county, or the Commissioner of Highways, as the case may be, may properly restore and maintain the same, and the costs thereof may be recovered by the city or town, or county, or Commonwealth,
from the renewable generator, in any court of proper jurisdiction.

History.
2009, c. 807, § 67-1110; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”